Utah statutes.
34-23-303.   Civil action allowed.

(1)  In addition to the administrative action authorized by Section 34-23-401, and criminal actions authorized by Sections 34-23-302 and 34-23-402, a minor employee may bring a civil action to enforce his right to a minimum wage under Section 34-23-301.

(2) (a)  An aggrieved minor employee is entitled to injunctive relief and may recover the difference between the wage paid and the minimum wage, plus interest.

(b)  The court may award court costs and attorney fees to the prevailing party.

(3)  An action brought under this section shall be brought within two years of the alleged violation.



Enacted by Chapter 8, 1990 General Session

